Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.120

Application of Uniform Disciplinary Act.

The Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs unlicensed practice, the issuance and denial of licenses, and the discipline of licensees under this chapter.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 412.]